zh-TW: 包含安全裝備: 滅火系統; HANS 錨點; 安全帶 (4 點式); 安全帶 (5 點式); 安全帶 (6 點式); 緊急停止開關; 賽車座椅; 防滾籠; 拖車鉤; 車窗網; 其他
es: Equipo de seguridad incluido: Sistema de extinción de incendios; Anclajes HANS; Arnés (4 puntos); Arnés (5 puntos); Arnés (6 puntos); Interruptor de emergencia; Asiento de carreras; Jaula antivuelco; Ganchos de remolque; Red de ventana; Otro
bg-BG: Включено оборудване за безопасност: Противопожарна система; HANS анкери; Предпазен колан (4-точков); Предпазен колан (5-точков); Предпазен колан (6-точков); Авариен прекъсвач; Състезателна седалка; Предпазна клетка; Куки за теглене; Мрежа за прозорец; Друго
ja: 安全装置付き: 消火システム; HANS アンカー; ハーネス (4 点式); ハーネス (5 点式); ハーネス (6 点式); キルスイッチ; レーシングシート; ロールケージ; 牽引フック; ウィンドウネット; その他
zh-CN: 包括安全装置: 灭火系统; HANS 锚固件; 安全带（4 点式）; 安全带（5 点式）; 安全带（6 点式）; 紧急停用开关; 赛车座椅; 防滚架; 拖车钩; 车窗网; 其他
sk-SK: Bezpečnostná výbava v cene: Hasiaci systém; Kotvy HANS; Pásy (4-bodové); Pásy (5-bodové); Pásy (6-bodové); Núdzový vypínač; Pretekárske sedadlo; Ochranná klietka; Ťažné oká; Sieť na okno; Iné
it: Attrezzatura di sicurezza inclusa: Sistema antincendio; Ancoraggi HANS; Imbracatura a 4 punti; Imbracatura a 5 punti; Imbracatura a 6 punti; Interruttore di emergenza; Sedile da corsa; Roll-bar; Ganci di traino; Rete per finestrino; Altro
ru: Состав защитного снаряжения: Система пожаротушения; Крепления HANS; Ремни безопасности (4-точечные); Ремни безопасности (5-точечные); Ремни безопасности (6-точечные); Механизм отключения; Гоночное сиденье; Каркас безопасности; Буксировочные крюки; Оконная сетка; Другое
pt-BR: Segurança, equipamento incluído: Sistema de supressão de incêndio; Ancoragens HANS; Cinto de segurança (4 pontos); Cinto de segurança (5 pontos); Cinto de segurança (6 pontos); kill switch; Banco de corrida; Gaiola de proteção; Ganchos de reboque; Rede de janela; Outros
nb: Inkludert sikkerhetsutstyr: Brannslukkingssystem; HANS-ankere; Sikkerhetssele (4-punkts); Sikkerhetssele (5-punkts); Sikkerhetssele (6-punkts); Nødstoppbryter; Racingsete; Veltebur; Slepekroker; Vindusnett; Annet
fi: Mukana tulevat turvallisuusvarusteet: Sammutusjärjestelmä; HANS-ankkurit; Turvavaljaat (4-pistevaljaat); Turvavaljaat (5-pistevaljaat); Turvavaljaat (6-pistevaljaat); Hätäkatkaisin; Kilpaistuin; Turvakehikko; Vetokoukut; Ikkunaverkko; Muu
de: Enthaltene Sicherheitsausrüstung: Feuerlöschsystem; HANS-Anker; Gurt (4-Punkt); Gurt (5-Punkt); Gurt (6-Punkt); Aus-Schalter; Rennsitz; Überrollkäfig; Abschlepphaken; Fensternetz; Sonstige
hu: Biztonsági felszerelés a csomagban: Tűzoltó rendszer; HANS rögzítők; Biztonsági öv (4 pontos); Biztonsági öv (5 pontos); Biztonsági öv (6 pontos); leállító kapcsoló; Versenyülés; Bukócső; Vontatószemek; Ablakháló; Egyéb
hr-HR: Uključena sigurnosna oprema: Sustav za gašenje požara; HANS sidrišta; Pojas (u 4 točke); Pojas (u 5 točaka); Pojas (u 6 točaka); Sigurnosni prekidač; Trkaće sjedalo; Zaštitni kavez; Kuke za vuču; Mreža za prozor; Ostalo
sv: Ingående säkerhetsutrustning: Brandsläckningssystem; HANS-fästen; 4-punktsbälte; 5-punktsbälte; 6-punktsbälte; Kill switch; Racingstol; Skyddsbur; Bogserkrokar; Fönsternät; Övrigt
pt-PT: Equipamento de segurança incluído: Sistema de extinção de incêndios; Âncoras HANS; Arnês (4 pontos); Arnês (5 pontos); Arnês (6 pontos); Interrupção de emergência; Assento de corrida; Gaiola de proteção; Ganchos de reboque; Rede de janela; Outro
en: Safety equipment included: Fire suppression system; HANS anchors; Harness (4-point); Harness (5-point); Harness (6-point); Kill switch; Racing seat; Roll cage; Tow hooks; Window net; Other
lt-LT: Pridedama saugos įranga: Gaisro gesinimo sistema; HANS tvirtinimo elementai; Saugos diržai (4 taškų); Saugos diržai (5 taškų); Saugos diržai (6 taškų); Apsauginis išjungiklis; Lenktyninė sėdynė; Saugos lankai; Tempimo kabliai; Langų tinklelis; Kita
tr: Dahil olan güvenlik ekipmanları: Yangın söndürme sistemi; HANS bağlantıları; Emniyet kemeri (4 noktalı); Emniyet kemeri (5 noktalı); Emniyet kemeri (6 noktalı); Acil kapatma anahtarı; Yarış koltuğu; Takla kafesi; Çekme kancaları; Cam filesi; Diğer
cs: Přiložené bezpečnostní vybavení: Hasicí systém; Úchyty HANS; Pás (4bodový); Pás (5bodový); Pás (6bodový); Nouzový vypínač; Závodní sedadlo; Ochranný rám; Tažná oka; Síť do okna; Jiné
el: Περιλαμβάνεται εξοπλισμός ασφαλείας: Σύστημα πυρόσβεσης; Σημεία στήριξης HANS; Ζώνη 4 σημείων; Ζώνη 5 σημείων; Ζώνη 6 σημείων; Διακόπτης ασφαλείας (kill switch); Αγωνιστικό κάθισμα; Κλωβός ασφαλείας (Roll cage); Γάντζοι ρυμούλκησης; Δίχτυ παραθύρου; Άλλο
pl: Dołączono sprzęt zabezpieczający: System gaśniczy; Kotwy systemu HANS; Pasy 4-punktowe; Pasy 5-punktowe; Pasy 6-punktowe; Wyłącznik awaryjny; Fotel wyścigowy; Klatka bezpieczeństwa; Haki holownicze; Siatka na szybę; Inne
ko: 안전 장비 포함: 화재 진압 시스템; HANS 앵커; 하네스(4점식); 하네스(5점식); 하네스(6점식); 킬 스위치; 레이싱 시트; 롤 케이지; 견인 후크; 창문 네트; 기타
fr: Équipement de sécurité inclus: Système d’extinction d’incendie; Ancrages HANS; Harnais (4 points); Harnais (5 points); Harnais (6 points); Interrupteur d’arrêt d'urgence; Siège baquet; Arceau de sécurité; Crochets de remorquage; Filet de vitre; Autre
ro-RO: Echipamente de protecție incluse: Sistem de stingere a incendiilor; Ancore HANS; Ham (în 4 puncte); Ham (în 5 puncte); Ham (în 6 puncte); Kill Switch; Scaun de curse; Cușcă de protecție (roll cage); Cârlige de remorcare; Plasă de protecție pentru geam; Altele
da: Medfølgende sikkerhedsudstyr: Brandslukningssystem; HANS-ankre; Sele (4-punkts); Sele (5-punkts); Sele (6-punkts); Nødlukning; Racersæde; Styrtbur; Trækkroge; Vinduesnet; Andet
vi: Thiết bị bảo hộ đi kèm: Hệ thống chữa cháy; Neo HANS; Đai an toàn (4 điểm); Đai an toàn (5 điểm); Đai an toàn (6 điểm); Công tắc ngắt khẩn cấp; Ghế đua; Khung chống lật; Móc kéo; Lưới cửa sổ; Khác
nl: Veiligheidsuitrusting inbegrepen: Brandblussysteem; HANS-ankers; Harnas (4-punts); Harnas (5-punts); Harnas (6-punts); Kill switch; Racestoel; Rolkooi; Trekhaken; Raamnet; Overige
th: อุปกรณ์ความปลอดภัยที่รวมมาในชุด: ระบบดับเพลิง; จุดยึดHANS; สายรัดนิรภัย(4จุด); สายรัดนิรภัย(5จุด); สายรัดนิรภัย(6จุด); สวิตช์ปิดฉุกเฉิน; เบาะรถแข่ง; โรลเคจ; ตะขอลาก; ตาข่ายหน้าต่าง; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vključena varnostna oprema: Sistem za gašenje požara; Sidrišča HANS; Varnostni pas (4-točkovni); Varnostni pas (5-točkovni); Varnostni pas (6-točkovni); Izredni izklopni mehanizem; Dirkalni sedež; Varnostna kletka; Vlečne kljuke; Mreža za okno; Drugo